Colorado statutes. TITLE 42 VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC
PART 2 EQUIPMENT
42-4-214. Visual signals on service vehicles - rules - definition.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, every authorized service vehicle must, in addition to any other equipment required by this article 4, be equipped with one or more warning lamps mounted as high as practicable, which must be capable of displaying in all directions one or more flashing, oscillating, or rotating yellow lights. Only yellow and no other color or combination of colors may be used as a warning lamp on an authorized service vehicle; except that an authorized service vehicle snowplow operated by a state, county, or local government may also be equipped with and use no more than two flashing, oscillating, or rotating blue lights as warning lamps. Lighted directional signs used by police and highway departments to direct traffic need not be visible except to the front and rear. Such lights must have sufficient intensity to be visible at five hundred feet in normal sunlight.

The warning lamps authorized in subsection (1) of this section shall be activated by the operator of an authorized service vehicle only when the vehicle is operating upon the roadway so as to create a hazard to other traffic. The use of such lamps shall not relieve the operator from the duty of using due care for the safety of others or from the obligation of using any other safety equipment or protective devices that are required by this article. Service vehicles authorized to operate also as emergency vehicles shall also be equipped to comply with signal requirements for emergency vehicles.

Whenever an authorized service vehicle is performing its service function and is displaying lights as authorized in subsection (1) of this section, drivers of all other vehicles shall exercise more than ordinary care and caution in approaching, overtaking, or passing such service vehicle and, in the case of highway and traffic maintenance equipment engaged in work upon the highway, shall comply with the instructions of section 42-4-712.

On or after January 1, 1978, only authorized service vehicles shall be equipped with the warning lights authorized in subsection (1) of this section.

The department of transportation shall determine by rule which types of vehicles render an essential public service when operating on or along a roadway and warrant designation as authorized service vehicles under specified conditions, including, without limitation, vehicles that sell or apply chains or other equipment to motor vehicles necessary to enable compliance with section 42-4-106.

Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class B traffic infraction; except that a person commits a class A traffic infraction if the person passes an authorized service vehicle snowplow that is operated by a state, county, or local government, displaying lights as authorized in subsection (1) of this section, and performing its service function in echelon formation with one or more other such snowplows.

As used in this subsection (6), unless the context otherwise requires, "echelon formation" means a formation in which snowplows are arranged diagonally, with each unit stationed behind and to the right, or behind and to the left, of the unit ahead.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2250, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 96:

(1) amended, p. 957, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(5) amended, p. 1334, § 4, effective August 3.

L. 2019:

(1) and (6) amended, (HB 19-1265), ch. 203, p. 2174, § 1, effective August 2.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-212.5 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-214 was relocated to § 42-4-216.

42-4-215. Signal lamps and devices - additional lighting equipment.

To be operated on a road, any motor vehicle may be equipped, and when required under this article must be equipped, with a stop lamp or lamps on the rear of the vehicle that, except as provided in section 42-12-204, display a red or amber light, or any shade of color between red and amber, visible from a distance of not less than one hundred feet to the rear in normal sunlight, that are actuated upon application of the service (foot) brake, and that may but need not be incorporated with one or more other rear lamps. Such stop lamp or lamps may also be automatically actuated by a mechanical device when the vehicle is reducing speed or stopping. If two or more stop lamps are installed on any motor vehicle, any device actuating such lamps must be so designed and installed that all stop lamps are actuated by such device.

Any motor vehicle may be equipped, and when required under this article must be equipped, with lamps showing to the front and rear for the purpose of indicating an intention to turn either to the right or to the left. The lamps showing to the front must be located on the same level and as widely spaced laterally as practicable and when in use display a white or amber light, or any shade of color between white and amber, visible from a distance of not less than one hundred feet to the front in normal sunlight, and the lamps showing to the rear must be located at the same level and as widely spaced laterally as practicable and, except as provided in section 42-12-204, when in use must display a red or amber light, or any shade of color between red and amber, visible from a distance of not less than one hundred feet to the rear in normal sunlight. When actuated, the lamps must indicate the intended direction of turning by flashing the light showing to the front and rear on the side toward which the turn is made.

No stop lamp or signal lamp shall project a glaring or dazzling light.

Any motor vehicle may be equipped with not more than two side cowl or fender lamps which shall emit an amber or white light without glare.

Any motor vehicle may be equipped with not more than one runningboard courtesy lamp on each side thereof, which shall emit a white or amber light without glare.

Any motor vehicle may be equipped with not more than two back-up lamps either separately or in combination with other lamps, but no such back-up lamp shall be lighted when the motor vehicle is in forward motion.

Any vehicle may be equipped with lamps that may be used for the purpose of warning the operators of other vehicles of the presence of a vehicular traffic hazard requiring the exercise of unusual care in approaching, overtaking, or passing and, when so equipped and when the vehicle is not in motion or is being operated at a speed of twenty-five miles per hour or less and at no other time, may display such warning in addition to any other warning signals required by this article. The lamps used to display such warning to the front must be mounted at the same level and as widely spaced laterally as practicable and display simultaneously flashing white or amber lights, or any shade of color between white and amber. The lamps used to display the warning to the rear must be mounted at the same level and as widely spaced laterally as practicable and, except as provided in section 42-12-204, show simultaneously flashing amber or red lights, or any shade of color between amber and red. These warning lights must be visible from a distance of not less than five hundred feet under normal atmospheric conditions at night.

Any vehicle eighty inches or more in overall width may be equipped with not more than three identification lamps showing to the front which shall emit an amber light without glare and not more than three identification lamps showing to the rear which shall emit a red light without glare. Such lamps shall be mounted horizontally.

Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class B traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2251, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 96:

(1), (2), and (7) amended, p. 440, § 4, effective April 22.

L. 2011:

(1), (2), and (7) amended, (SB 11-031), ch. 86, p. 244, § 6, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-213 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-215 was relocated to § 42-4-217.

42-4-215.5. Signal lamps and devices - street rod vehicles and custom motor vehicles. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 96:

Entire section added, p. 441, § 5, effective April 22.

L. 2005:

(1)(b) repealed, p. 1173, § 9, effective August 8.

L. 2011:

Entire section repealed, (SB 11-031), ch. 86, p. 249, § 22, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section was relocated to § 42-12-204 in 2011.

42-4-216. Multiple-beam road lights.

Except as provided in this article, the head lamps or the auxiliary driving lamp or the auxiliary passing lamp or combination thereof on motor vehicles, other than motorcycles or low-power scooters, shall be so arranged that the driver may select at will between distributions of light projected to different elevations, and such lamps may, in addition, be so arranged that such selection can be made automatically, subject to the following limitations:

There shall be an uppermost distribution of light or composite beam so aimed and of such intensity as to reveal persons and vehicles at a distance of at least three hundred fifty feet ahead for all conditions of loading.

There shall be a lowermost distribution of light or composite beam so aimed and of sufficient intensity to reveal persons and vehicles at a distance of at least one hundred feet ahead; and on a straight level road under any condition of loading, none of the high-intensity portion of the beam shall be directed to strike the eyes of an approaching driver.

(1.5) Head lamps arranged to provide a single distribution of light not supplemented by auxiliary driving lamps shall be permitted for low-speed electric vehicles in lieu of multiple-beam, road-lighting equipment specified in this section if the single distribution of light complies with paragraph (b) of subsection (1) of this section.

A new motor vehicle, other than a motorcycle or low-power scooter, that has multiple-beam road-lighting equipment, shall be equipped with a beam indicator, which shall be lighted whenever the uppermost distribution of light from the head lamps is in use and shall not otherwise be lighted. Said indicator shall be so designed and located that when lighted it will be readily visible without glare to the driver of the vehicle so equipped.

Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class B traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2252, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 97:

(1.5) added, p. 393, § 4, effective August 6.

L. 2009:

(1.5) amended, (SB 09-075), ch. 418, p. 2323, § 10, effective August 5; IP(1) and (2) amended, (HB 09-1026), ch. 281, p. 1274, § 43, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-214 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-216 was relocated to § 42-4-218.

42-4-217. Use of multiple-beam lights.

Whenever a motor vehicle is being operated on a roadway or shoulder adjacent thereto during the times specified in section 42-4-204, the driver shall use a distribution of light, or composite beam, directed high enough and of sufficient intensity to reveal persons and vehicles at a safe distance in advance of the vehicle, subject to the following requirements and limitations:

Whenever a driver of a vehicle approaches an oncoming vehicle within five hundred feet, such driver shall use a distribution of light or composite beam so aimed that the glaring rays are not projected into the eyes of the oncoming driver. The lowermost distribution of light or composite beam specified in section 42-4-216 (1)(b) shall be deemed to avoid glare at all times, regardless of road contour and loading.

Whenever the driver of a vehicle follows another vehicle within two hundred feet to the rear, except when engaged in the act of overtaking and passing, such driver shall use a distribution of light permissible under this title other than the uppermost distribution of light specified in section 42-4-216 (1)(a).

A low-speed electric vehicle may use the distribution of light authorized in section 42-4-216 (1.5).

Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class A traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2253, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2009:

(1)(c) added, (SB 09-075), ch. 418, p. 2324, § 11, effective August 5.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-215 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-217 was relocated to § 42-4-219.

42-4-218. Single-beam road-lighting equipment.

Head lamps arranged to provide a single distribution of light not supplemented by auxiliary driving lamps shall be permitted on motor vehicles manufactured and sold prior to July 15, 1936, in lieu of multiple-beam road-lighting equipment specified in section 42-4-216 if the single distribution of light complies with the following requirements and limitations:

The head lamps shall be so aimed that when the vehicle is not loaded none of the high-intensity portion of the light shall, at a distance of twenty-five feet ahead, project higher than a level of five inches below the level of the center of the lamp from which it comes and in no case higher than forty-two inches above the level on which the vehicle stands at a distance of seventy-five feet ahead.

The intensity shall be sufficient to reveal persons and vehicles at a distance of at least two hundred feet.

Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class B traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2253, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-216 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-218 was relocated to § 42-4-220.

42-4-219. Number of lamps permitted.

Whenever a motor vehicle equipped with head lamps as required in this article is also equipped with any auxiliary lamps or a spot lamp or any other lamp on the front thereof projecting a beam of an intensity greater than three hundred candlepower, not more than a total of four of any such lamps on the front of a vehicle shall be lighted at any one time when upon a highway. Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class B traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2253, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-217 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-219 was relocated to § 42-4-222.

42-4-220. Low-power scooters - lighting equipment - department control - use and operation.

A low-power scooter when in use at the times specified in section 42-4-204 shall be equipped with a lamp on the front that shall emit a white light visible from a distance of at least five hundred feet to the front and with a red reflector on the rear, of a type approved by the department, that shall be visible from all distances from fifty feet to three hundred feet to the rear when directly in front of lawful upper beams of head lamps on a motor vehicle. A lamp emitting a red light visible from a distance of five hundred feet to the rear may be used in addition to the red reflector.

No person shall operate a low-power scooter unless it is equipped with a bell or other device capable of giving a signal audible for a distance of at least one hundred feet; except that a low-power scooter shall not be equipped with nor shall any person use upon a low-power scooter a siren or whistle.

A low-power scooter shall be equipped with a brake that will enable the operator to make the braked wheels skid on dry, level, clean pavement.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2009, (HB 09-1026), ch. 281, p. 1274, § 44, effective October 1, 2009.)

Any lighted lamp or illuminating device upon a motor vehicle, other than head lamps, spot lamps, auxiliary lamps, flashing turn signals, emergency vehicle warning lamps, and school bus warning lamps, which projects a beam of light of an intensity greater than three hundred candlepower shall be so directed that no part of the high-intensity portion of the beam will strike the level of the roadway on which the vehicle stands at a distance of more than seventy-five feet from the vehicle.

Repealed.

This subsection (3) shall not be construed to prohibit the use on any vehicle of simultaneously flashing hazard warning lights as provided by section 42-4-215 (7).

No person shall have for sale, sell, or offer for sale, for use upon or as a part of the equipment of a motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer or for use upon any such vehicle, any head lamp, auxiliary or fog lamp, rear lamp, signal lamp, or reflector, which reflector is required under this article, or parts of any of the foregoing which tend to change the original design or performance thereof, unless of a type which has been approved by the department.

No person shall have for sale, sell, or offer for sale, for use upon or as a part of the equipment of a motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer, any lamp or device mentioned in this section which has been approved by the department unless such lamp or device bears thereon the trademark or name under which it is approved so as to be legible when installed.

No person shall use upon any motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer any lamps mentioned in this section unless said lamps are mounted, adjusted, and aimed in accordance with instructions of the department.

The department is authorized to approve or disapprove lighting standards and specifications for the approval of such lighting devices and their installation, adjustment, and aiming and their adjustment when in use on motor vehicles.

The department is required to approve or disapprove any lighting device, of a type on which approval is specifically required in this article, within a reasonable time after such device has been submitted.

The department is authorized to provide the procedure which shall be followed when any device is submitted for approval.

The department upon approving any such lamp or device shall issue to the applicant a certificate of approval, together with any instructions determined by the department to be reasonably necessary.

The department shall provide lists of all lamps and devices by name and type which have been approved by it.

When the department has reason to believe that an approved device as being sold commercially does not comply with the requirements of this article, the executive director of the department or the director's designated representatives may, after giving thirty days' previous notice to the person holding the certificate of approval for such device in the state, conduct a hearing upon the question of compliance of said approved device. After said hearing, said executive director shall determine whether said approved device meets the requirements of this article. If said device does not meet the requirements of this article, the director shall give notice to the person holding the certificate of approval for such device in this state.

If, at the expiration of ninety days after such notice, the person holding the certificate of approval for such device has failed to establish to the satisfaction of the executive director of the department that said approved device as thereafter to be sold meets the requirements of this article, said executive director shall suspend or revoke the approval issued therefor and may require that all said devices sold since the notification following the hearing be replaced with devices that do comply with the requirements of this article, until or unless such device, at the sole expense of the applicant, shall be resubmitted to and retested by an authorized testing agency and is found to meet the requirements of this article. The department may, at the time of the retest, purchase in the open market and submit to the testing agency one or more sets of such approved devices, and, if such device upon such retest fails to meet the requirements of this article, the department may refuse to renew the certificate of approval of such device.

Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class B traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2254, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2004:

(3)(b) repealed, p. 1081, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(1) and (2) amended, (HB 09-1026), ch. 281, p. 1274, § 44, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-218 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-220 was relocated to § 42-4-223.

Cross references:

For specifications for lighting of snow-removal equipment, see § 42-4-224 (4); for authorization for red lights on brand inspectors' cars, see § 35-53-128 (3).

42-4-221. Bicycle, electric scooter, and personal mobility device equipment.

No other provision of this part 2 and no provision of part 3 of this article 4 applies to a bicycle, electrical assisted bicycle, electric scooter, or EPAMD or to equipment for use on a bicycle, electrical assisted bicycle, electric scooter, or EPAMD except those provisions in this article 4 made specifically applicable to such a vehicle.

Every bicycle, electrical assisted bicycle, electric scooter, or EPAMD in use at the times described in section 42-4-204 shall be equipped with a lamp on the front emitting a white light visible from a distance of at least five hundred feet to the front.

Every bicycle, electrical assisted bicycle, electric scooter, or EPAMD shall be equipped with a red reflector of a type approved by the department, which shall be visible for six hundred feet to the rear when directly in front of lawful lower beams of head lamps on a motor vehicle.

Every bicycle, electrical assisted bicycle, electric scooter, or EPAMD when in use at the times described in section 42-4-204 shall be equipped with reflective material of sufficient size and reflectivity to be visible from both sides for six hundred feet when directly in front of lawful lower beams of head lamps on a motor vehicle or, in lieu of such reflective material, with a lighted lamp visible from both sides from a distance of at least five hundred feet.

A bicycle, electrical assisted bicycle, electric scooter, or EPAMD or its rider may be equipped with lights or reflectors in addition to those required by subsections (2) to (4) of this section.

A bicycle, electrical assisted bicycle, or electric scooter shall not be equipped with, nor shall any person use upon a bicycle, electrical assisted bicycle, or electric scooter, any siren or whistle.

Every bicycle, electrical assisted bicycle, or electric scooter shall be equipped with a brake or brakes that will enable its rider to stop the bicycle, electrical assisted bicycle, or electric scooter within twenty-five feet from a speed of ten miles per hour on dry, level, clean pavement.

A person engaged in the business of selling bicycles, electrical assisted bicycles, or electric scooters at retail shall not sell any bicycle, electrical assisted bicycle, or electric scooter unless the bicycle, electrical assisted bicycle, or electric scooter has an identifying number permanently stamped or cast on its frame.

(8.5) A local government may regulate the operation of an electric scooter in a manner that is no more restrictive than the manner in which the local government may regulate the operation of a class 1 electrical assisted bicycle.

On or after January 1, 2018, every manufacturer or distributor of new electrical assisted bicycles intended for sale or distribution in this state shall permanently affix to each electrical assisted bicycle, in a prominent location, a label that contains the classification number, top assisted speed, and motor wattage of the electrical assisted bicycle. The label must be printed in the arial font in at least nine-point type.

A person shall not knowingly modify an electrical assisted bicycle so as to change the speed capability or motor engagement of the electrical assisted bicycle without also appropriately replacing, or causing to be replaced, the label indicating the classification required by subsection (9)(a) of this section.

An electrical assisted bicycle must comply with the equipment and manufacturing requirements for bicycles adopted by the United States consumer product safety commission and codified at 16 CFR 1512 or its successor regulation.

A class 2 electrical assisted bicycle must operate in a manner so that the electric motor is disengaged or ceases to function when the brakes are applied. Class 1 and class 3 electrical assisted bicycles must be equipped with a mechanism or circuit that cannot be bypassed and that causes the electric motor to disengage or cease to function when the rider stops pedaling.

A class 3 electrical assisted bicycle must be equipped with a speedometer that displays, in miles per hour, the speed the electrical assisted bicycle is traveling.

A person who violates this section commits a class B traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2256, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2009:

(1) to (8) amended, (HB 09-1026), ch. 281, p. 1275, § 45, effective October 1.

L. 2017:

(9) amended and (10) and (11) added, (HB 17-1151), ch. 98, p. 296, § 4, effective August 9.

L. 2019:

(1) to (8) amended and (8.5) added, (HB 19-1221), ch. 271, p. 2559, § 5, effective May 23.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-218.5 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-221 was relocated to § 42-4-224.

42-4-222. Volunteer firefighters - volunteer ambulance attendants - special lights and alarm systems.

All members of volunteer fire departments regularly attached to the fire departments organized within incorporated towns, counties, cities, and fire protection districts and all members of a volunteer ambulance service regularly attached to a volunteer ambulance service within an area that the ambulance service would be reasonably expected to serve may have their private automobiles equipped with a signal lamp or a combination of signal lamps capable of displaying flashing, oscillating, or rotating red lights visible to the front and rear at five hundred feet in normal sunlight. In addition to the red light, flashing, oscillating, or rotating signal lights may be used that emit white or white in combination with red lights. At least one of such signal lamps or combination of signal lamps shall be mounted on the top of the automobile. Said automobiles may be equipped with audible signal systems such as sirens, whistles, or bells. Said lights, together with any signal systems authorized by this subsection (1), may be used only as authorized by subsection (3) of this section or when a member of a fire department is responding to or attending a fire alarm or other emergency or when a member of an ambulance service is responding to an emergency requiring the member's services. Except as authorized in subsection (3) of this section, neither such lights nor such signals shall be used for any other purpose than those set forth in this subsection (1). If used for any other purpose, such use shall constitute a violation of this subsection (1), and the violator commits a class B traffic infraction.

Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection (1), a member of a volunteer fire department or a volunteer ambulance service may equip his or her private automobile with the equipment described in paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) only after receiving a permit for the equipment from the fire chief of the fire department or chief executive officer of the ambulance service through which the volunteer serves.

(Deleted by amendment,

L. 96, p. 957

, § 3, effective July 1, 1996.)

A fire engine collector or member of a fire department may use the signal system authorized by subsection (1) of this section in a funeral, parade, or for other special purposes if the circumstances would not lead a reasonable person to believe that such vehicle is responding to an actual emergency.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2257, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 96:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 957, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(1) amended, p. 1081, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

(1)(a) amended and (3) added, p. 195, § 2, effective July 1.

42-4-223. Brakes.

Brake equipment required:

Every motor vehicle, other than a motorcycle, when operated upon a highway shall be equipped with brakes adequate to control the movement of and to stop and hold such vehicle, including two separate means of applying the brakes, each of which means shall be effective to apply the brakes to at least two wheels. If these two separate means of applying the brakes are connected in any way, they shall be so constructed that failure of any one part of the operating mechanism shall not leave the motor vehicle without brakes on at least two wheels.

Every motorcycle and low-power scooter, when operated upon a highway, shall be equipped with at least one brake, which may be operated by hand or foot.

Every trailer or semitrailer of a gross weight of three thousand pounds or more, when operated upon a highway, shall be equipped with brakes adequate to control the movement of and to stop and to hold such vehicle and so designed as to be applied by the driver of the towing motor vehicle from the cab, and said brakes shall be so designed and connected that in case of an accidental breakaway of the towed vehicle the brakes shall be automatically applied. The provisions of this paragraph (c) shall not be applicable to any trailer which does not meet the definition of "commercial vehicle" as that term is defined in section 42-4-235 (1)(a) and which is owned by a farmer when transporting agricultural products produced on the owner's farm or supplies back to the farm of the owner of the trailer, tank trailers not exceeding ten thousand pounds gross weight used solely for transporting liquid fertilizer or gaseous fertilizer under pressure, or distributor trailers not exceeding ten thousand pounds gross weight used solely for transporting and distributing dry fertilizer when hauled by a truck capable of stopping within the distance specified in subsection (2) of this section.

Every motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer constructed or sold in this state or operated upon the highways shall be equipped with service brakes upon all wheels of every such vehicle; except that:

Any trailer or semitrailer of less than three thousand pounds gross weight, or any horse trailer of a capacity of two horses or less, or any trailer which does not meet the definition of "commercial vehicle" as that term is defined in section 42-4-235 (1)(a) and which is owned by a farmer when transporting agricultural products produced on the owner's farm or supplies back to the farm of the owner of the trailer, or tank trailers not exceeding ten thousand pounds gross weight used solely for transporting liquid fertilizer or gaseous fertilizer under pressure, or distributor trailers not exceeding ten thousand pounds gross weight used solely for transporting and distributing dry fertilizer when hauled by a truck capable of stopping with loaded trailer attached in the distance specified by subsection (2) of this section need not be equipped with brakes, and any two-wheel motor vehicle need have brakes on only one wheel.

Any truck or truck tractor, manufactured before July 25, 1980, and having three or more axles, need not have brakes on the wheels of the front or tandem steering axles if the brakes on the other wheels meet the performance requirements of subsection (2) of this section.

Every trailer or semitrailer of three thousand pounds or more gross weight must have brakes on all wheels.

Provisions of this subsection (1) shall not apply to manufactured homes.

Performance ability of brakes:

The service brakes upon any motor vehicle or combination of vehicles shall be adequate to stop such vehicle when traveling twenty miles per hour within a distance of forty feet when upon dry asphalt or concrete pavement surface free from loose material where the grade does not exceed one percent.

Under the conditions stated in paragraph (a) of this subsection (2), the hand brakes shall be adequate to stop such vehicle within a distance of fifty-five feet, and said hand brake shall be adequate to hold such vehicle stationary on any grade upon which operated.

Under the conditions stated in paragraph (a) of this subsection (2), the service brakes upon a motor vehicle equipped with two-wheel brakes only, when permitted under this section, shall be adequate to stop the vehicle within a distance of fifty-five feet.

All braking distances specified in this section shall apply to all vehicles mentioned, whether such vehicles are not loaded or are loaded to the maximum capacity permitted under this title.

All brakes shall be maintained in good working order and shall be so adjusted as to operate as equally as possible with respect to the wheels on opposite sides of the vehicle.

(2.5) The department of public safety is specifically authorized to adopt rules relating to the use of surge brakes.

Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class A traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2258, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 96:

(2.5) added, p. 629, § 2, effective January 1, 1997.

L. 2009:

(1)(b) amended, (HB 09-1026), ch. 281, p. 1276, § 46, effective October 1.

42-4-224. Horns or warning devices - definition.

Every motor vehicle, when operated upon a highway, shall be equipped with a horn in good working order and capable of emitting sound audible under normal conditions from a distance of not less than two hundred feet, but no horn or other warning device shall emit an unreasonably loud or harsh sound, except as provided in section 42-4-213 (1) in the case of authorized emergency vehicles or as provided in section 42-4-222. The driver of a motor vehicle, when reasonably necessary to ensure safe operation, shall give audible warning with the horn but shall not otherwise use such horn when upon a highway.

No vehicle shall be equipped with nor shall any person use upon a vehicle any audible device except as otherwise permitted in this section. It is permissible but not required that any vehicle be equipped with a theft alarm signal device which is so arranged that it cannot be used by the driver as a warning signal unless the alarm device is a required part of the vehicle. Nothing in this section is meant to preclude the use of audible warning devices that are activated when the vehicle is backing. Any authorized emergency vehicle may be equipped with an audible signal device under section 42-4-213 (1), but such device shall not be used except when such vehicle is operated in response to an emergency call or in the actual pursuit of a suspected violator of the law or for other special purposes, including, but not limited to, funerals, parades, and the escorting of dignitaries. Such device shall not be used for such special purposes unless the circumstances would not lead a reasonable person to believe that such vehicle is responding to an actual emergency.

A bicycle, electrical assisted bicycle, electric scooter, or low-power scooter shall not be equipped with, nor shall any person use upon a bicycle, electrical assisted bicycle, electric scooter, or low-power scooter, a siren or whistle.

Snowplows and other snow-removal equipment shall display flashing yellow lights meeting the requirements of section 42-4-214 as a warning to drivers when such equipment is in service on the highway.

When any snowplow or other snow-removal equipment displaying flashing yellow lights is engaged in snow and ice removal or control, drivers of all other vehicles shall exercise more than ordinary care and caution in approaching, overtaking, or passing such snowplow.

The driver of a snowplow, while engaged in the removal or control of snow and ice on any highway open to traffic and while displaying the required flashing yellow warning lights as provided by section 42-4-214, shall not be charged with any violation of the provisions of this article relating to parking or standing, turning, backing, or yielding the right-of-way. These exemptions shall not relieve the driver of a snowplow from the duty to drive with due regard for the safety of all persons, nor shall these exemptions protect the driver of a snowplow from the consequences of a reckless or careless disregard for the safety of others.

Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class B traffic infraction; except that a person commits a class A traffic infraction if the person passes an authorized service vehicle snowplow that is operated by a state, county, or local government, displaying lights as authorized in section 42-4-214, and performing its service function in echelon formation with one or more other such snowplows.

As used in this subsection (6), unless the context otherwise requires, "echelon formation" means a formation in which snowplows are arranged diagonally, with each unit stationed behind and to the right, or behind and to the left, of the unit ahead.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2259, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2005:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 196, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(3) amended, (HB 09-1026), ch. 281, p. 1276, § 47, effective October 1.

L. 2019:

(3) amended, (HB 19-1221), ch. 271, p. 2560, § 6, effective May 23; (6) amended, (HB 19-1265), ch. 203, p. 2175, § 2, effective August 2.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-221 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-224 was relocated to § 42-4-227.